District of Columbia statutes.
15-309

Death of judgment debtor after delivery of execution.

The death of the judgment debtor after the execution issued on the judgment has been delivered to the marshal does not affect his authority to proceed against the property bound by it.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-309.
1973 Ed., § 15-309.